Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 4.1. Remedies for Violations of Preceding
Chapters and Chapter 6,
Article 8, of Title 18.2.

§ 59.1-68.2.
Authority of Attorney General.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the law to the contrary, the Attorney General may investigate and bring an action in the name of the Commonwealth to enjoin any violation of Chapters 2.1 (§ 59.1-21.1 et seq.) through 3.1 (§ 59.1-41.1 et seq.) and
of Article 8 (§

18.2-214

et seq.), Chapter 6 of Title 18.2.

History.
1970, c. 780; 1973, c. 537; 1975, c. 43; 1984, c. 582.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1387 (1970).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 5 Parties. § 5.02 Competency. Bryson.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 2.

§ 59.1-68.3.
Action for damages or penalty for violation of Article 8, Chapter 6 of Title 18.2 or Chapter 2.1 of Title 59.1; attorney’s fees.

Any person who suffers loss as the result of a violation of Article 8 (§

18.2-214

et seq.), Chapter 6 of Title 18.2 or Chapter 2.1 (§ 59.1-21.1 et seq.) of Title 59.1 shall be entitled to bring an individual action to recover damages, or $100, whichever is greater. Certified copies of the transcript
and exhibits in evidence in any final proceeding in which the Attorney General has obtained a permanent injunction for a violation of Article 8, Chapter 6 of Title 18.2 or Chapter 2.1 of Title 59.1 shall be admissible in evidence in
any action brought pursuant to this section by any person claiming damage as a result of the enjoined conduct. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in addition to the damages recovered by the aggrieved party,
such person may be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.

History.
1973, c. 537; 1975, c. 43; 1976, c. 87.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of real estate and land use law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 357 (2004).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 14 Costs. § 14.02 Items Included. Bryson.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
1A M.J. Actions, § 5; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 36.

§ 59.1-68.4.
Suits by attorneys for the Commonwealth and city and county attorneys.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the law to the contrary, any attorney for the Commonwealth, or the attorney for any city or county, may investigate and cause to be brought suit in the name of the Commonwealth, or of the county or city, to enjoin
any violation of Chapter 2.1 (§ 59.1-21.1 et seq.) of this title and of Article 8 (§

18.2-214

et seq.), Chapter 6 of Title 18.2. The court having jurisdiction may enjoin such violations notwithstanding the existence of an adequate remedy at law. In any action under this section, it shall not be necessary that
damages be alleged or proved.

History.
1974, c. 644; 1975, c. 43.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1974 act having been 15.1-23.4.

Law Review.

For survey of developments in Virginia commercial law for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1475 (1974).

§ 59.1-68.5.
Further provisions as to actions for violation of Article 8, Chapter 6 of Title 18.2.

Any person who suffers loss as the result of a violation of Article 8 (§

18.2-214

et seq.), Chapter 6 of Title 18.2 shall be entitled to bring an individual action to recover damages, or $100, whichever is greater. Certified copies of the transcript and exhibits in evidence in any final proceeding
in which the Commonwealth, or a county or city has obtained a permanent injunction for a violation of Article 8, Chapter 6 of Title 18.2 shall be admissible in evidence in any action brought pursuant to this section by any person claiming
damage as a result of the enjoined conduct. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in addition to the damages recovered by the aggrieved party, such person may be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.

History.
1974, c. 644; 1975, c. 43.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1974 act having been 15.1-23.5.

Law Review.

For survey of developments in Virginia commercial law for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1475 (1974).